Utah statutes.
54-8c-5.   Exemptions.
This chapter does not apply to construction, reconstruction, operation, or
maintenance by an authorized person of:
(a)  overhead electrical, cable television, or communications circuits or
conductors and their supporting structures;
(b)  electrical generating, transmission, or distribution systems; or
(c)  communications, cable television, or overhead lighting systems.
